Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-701
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-701 to 13-706 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Emergency Seat of Local Government Act.

Laws 1959, c. 92, § 1, p. 402;

Laws 1972, LB 1048, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2101.